Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions
27-1-5.
Applicability of “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act” to rules and regulations promulgated by board; affirmation of decision by operation of law; appellate review.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, all rules and regulations promulgated by the board under this title shall be promulgated pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” For the purposes of this title, rule making under subsection (b) of Code Section 50-13-4 in response to an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare shall include rule making to protect wildlife, the public, and the natural resources of this state in the event of fire, flood, disease, pollution, or other emergency situations.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, when a petition for judicial review of a final decision of the board in any matter arising under this title is filed pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” if the superior court in which the petition for review is filed does not hear the case within 90 days from the date the petition for review is filed with the court, the final decision of the board shall be considered affirmed by operation of law unless a hearing originally scheduled to be heard within the 90 days has been continued to a date certain by order of the court. In the event a hearing is held later than 90 days after the date the petition for review is filed with the court because a hearing originally scheduled to be heard within the 90 days has been continued to a date certain by order of the court, the final decision of the board shall be considered affirmed by operation of law if no order of the court disposing of the issues presented for review has been entered within 30 days after the date of the continued hearing. If a case is heard within 90 days from the date the petition for review is filed, the final decision of the board shall be considered affirmed by operation of law if no order of the court dispositive of the issues presented for review has been entered within 30 days of the date of the hearing.

A decision of the board affirmed by operation of law under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be subject to appellate review in the same manner as a decision of the superior court. The date of entry of judgment for purposes of appeal pursuant to Code Section 5-6-35 of a decision affirmed by operation of law without action of the superior court shall be the last date on which the superior court could have taken action under subsection (b) of this Code section. Upon the setting aside of any such decision of the board, the court may recommit the controversy to the board for further hearing or proceedings in conformity with the judgment and opinion of the court; or such court may enter the proper judgment upon the findings, as the nature of the case may demand. Such decree of the court shall have the same effect and all proceedings in relation thereto shall, subject to the other provisions of this chapter, thereafter be the same as though rendered in an action heard and determined by the court.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any reference to an administrative law judge or hearing officer in this title shall be to an administrative law judge appointed by the chief state administrative law judge. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final administrative decision in any matter and any party to the matter, including the commissioner, shall have the right of judicial review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50. Any request for administrative review by an administrative law judge appointed by the chief state administrative law judge shall be filed with the commissioner.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any reference to a final decision of the Board of Natural Resources in this title shall be to a final administrative decision by an administrative law judge appointed by the chief state administrative law judge.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 800, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1990, p. 223, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 2.

27-1-6.
Powers and duties of department generally.

The department shall have the following powers and duties:

Subject to all applicable state laws, to acquire by purchase, condemnation, lease, agreement, gift, or devise lands or waters suitable for the purposes enumerated in this paragraph and to develop, operate, and maintain the same for the following purposes:

For fish hatcheries, nursery ponds, game farms, sanctuaries, reservations, and refuges;

For wildlife restoration, propagation, protection, preservation, research, or management; and

For public hunting, fishing, or trapping areas, where the public may hunt, fish, or trap in accordance with the provisions of law and the rules and regulations of the board;

To capture, propagate, transport, purchase, sell, band, or release any species of wildlife for propagation, research, or stocking purposes; to safeguard and enhance the habitat on which the wildlife depends; and to exercise control measures of nuisance or destructive species;

To enter into cooperative agreements with educational institutions and state, federal, and other agencies to promote wildlife management, conservation, and research;

To purchase all uniforms, equipment, and supplies necessary for the administration of this title;

To carry out the operational, field, and administrative functions contained in this title;

To publish in print or electronically and distribute magazines, pamphlets, books, or literature of any nature as may be necessary to inform and educate the public concerning the wildlife resources of the state and the functions, duties, activities, laws, rules, and regulations of the department pursuant to this title and pursuant to any other title;

To keep a public record which correctly discloses all moneys received and expended by the department and all such information as may be necessary or proper in the conduct of the affairs and business of the department. The books and accounts of the department shall be audited in the same way as other books and accounts of the other departments of the state are audited;

To pay to each game warden the expenses incurred by such warden in the performance of his duties;

To contract with private landowners for the purposes of managing and operating public hunting and fishing areas on the property of such private landowners; and

To develop an official waterfowl stamp for the State of Georgia and to issue such stamp to any interested person and to contract with any person granting such person the right to reproduce and market the official waterfowl stamp in stamp, print, poster, or such other form as the department shall determine and to contract with any person for the purpose of promoting, supporting, or otherwise assisting any waterfowl program of the department, including, but not limited to, public education; research; acquisition of wetlands; and management, development, and protection of waterfowl programs; provided, however, that not more than 15 percent of the funds retained by the department, if any, shall be used for law enforcement activities. The department is authorized to establish a special fund to be known as the “Waterfowl Stamp Fund.” This fund shall consist of all moneys paid to the department as royalties, all moneys derived from the sale of any official waterfowl stamp, and all moneys contributed to the fund for the purposes provided in this paragraph and all interest thereon. All balances in the fund shall be deposited in an interest-bearing account identifying the fund and shall be carried forward each year so that no part thereof may be deposited in the general treasury. The department shall administer the fund and may expend moneys held in the fund in furtherance of the purposes provided in this paragraph. Moneys paid into this fund shall be deemed supplemental to and shall in no way supplant funding that would otherwise be appropriate for these purposes. As used in this paragraph, the term “waterfowl” means any species of ducks, swans, or geese.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1924, p. 101, §§ 1, 3, 4, 7, 26; Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 22; Ga. L. 1925, p. 339, § 31; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Code 1933, §§ 45-106, 45-109; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, §§ 1, 4, 9; Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, §§ 1, 2, 12, 14; Ga. L. 1945, p. 404, §§ 4, 8; Ga. L. 1952, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 149, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 5; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1527; Ga. L. 1973, p. 344, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-105, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 691, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 357, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 506, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in paragraph (8).

Cross references.

Department of Natural Resources generally, §

12-2-1

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “Moneys” was substituted for “Monies” in the next-to-last sentence in paragraph (10).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “such warden” was substituted for “such ranger” in paragraph (8).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Boating Infrastructure Grant Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Coastal Resources, Subject 391-2-7.

Law reviews.

For article discussing regulation of selected activities to effect environmental planning, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 53 (1975).

For note, “Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia,” recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

27-1-7.
Technical assistance for control or elimination of wild or abandoned dogs.

Upon the request of the governing authority of a city, county, or combination thereof, the department is authorized to provide technical assistance to the city, county, or combination thereof relative to the control or elimination of wild or abandoned dogs running at large, provided that, with the exception of the technical assistance provided in accordance with this Code section, all costs relative to the control or elimination shall be borne by the city, county, or combination thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-105.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 849, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

27-1-8.
Construction of fish ladders; requiring construction by private persons; assessment of cost upon refusal; issuance of execution.

The department is authorized to provide for the free passage of fish in the fresh-water streams of Georgia for the purpose of spawning and propagating and to erect or cause to be erected fish ladders or other passageways whereby fish may pass over any dam or other obstruction placed in the fresh-water streams of Georgia by any person.

It shall be the duty of the department to give written notice to any person owning, leasing, or constructing any dam or other obstruction which restricts the free passage of fish in the fresh-water streams of this state, which notice shall require the person to provide a suitable fish ladder or passageway over the dam or obstruction. The person shall, within 60 days after the receipt of the notice, provide at his own expense a fish ladder or other suitable passageway for the purpose of allowing fish in such fresh water to pass freely over the dam or obstruction.

Should any person owning, leasing, or constructing any dam or other obstruction in the fresh-water streams of this state fail and refuse to provide a fish ladder or other passageway after receiving the notice, as required in subsection (b) of this Code section, the department is authorized to build or erect a fish ladder or other passageway over the dam or obstruction; and the cost of the same shall be assessed by the department against the person owning, leasing, or constructing the dam or obstruction.

The department is authorized to issue an execution in the nature of a fi. fa. against any person against whom an assessment has been made pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section. The assessment shall be collected by any sheriff or other authorized officer of the state by means of levy and sale in the same manner as the collection of any other fi. fas.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 380, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 19; Code 1933, § 45-106, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

Cross references.

Dam safety generally, §

12-5-370

et seq.

27-1-9.
Consent to federal rules and regulations pursuant to federal law authorizing purchase of land by United States government for river navigability purposes.

The consent of the General Assembly is given to the making by the Congress of the United States or under its authority of all such rules and regulations as the federal government shall determine to be needed in respect to game animals, game and nongame birds, and fish on such lands in the northern part of Georgia as shall have been or may hereafter be purchased by the United States under the terms of the act of Congress of March 1, 1911, entitled “An Act to Enable any state to Cooperate with any other state or states, or with the United States, for the Protection of the Watersheds of Navigable Streams, and to Appoint a Commission for the Acquisition of Lands for the Purpose of Conserving the Navigability of Navigable Rivers” (36 United States Statutes at Large, page 961), and acts of Congress supplementary thereto and amendatory thereof, and in or on the waters thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 106, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-336; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 24; Code 1933, § 45-110, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The federal Act of March 1, 1911, 36 Stat. 961, referred to in this Code section, is codified principally at 16 U.S.C. §§ 480, 500, 515 through 519, 521, 552, and 563.

27-1-10.
Assent to federal law respecting wildlife conservation and restoration projects, fish restoration projects, wildlife conservation education, and wildlife associated recreation projects.

The State of Georgia assents to the provisions of P.L. 75-415 and P.L. 81-681. The department is authorized, empowered, and directed to perform such acts as may be necessary to establish and conduct cooperative wildlife restoration projects as defined in P.L. 75-415, cooperative fish restoration projects as defined in P.L. 81-681, and wildlife conservation and restoration programs, wildlife conservation education, and wildlife associated recreation projects as defined in P.L. 106-553, as well as the regulations promulgated under those federal acts. No funds accruing to the state from license fees paid by hunters or fishermen or interest thereon shall be diverted for any purpose other than the administration of the department and for the study, protection, preservation, restoration, or propagation of fish and wildlife in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, § 11; Ga. L. 1951, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, §§ 25, 26; Code 1933, §§ 45-111, 45-112, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 2.

U.S. Code.

P.L. 75-415, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 669

et seq. P.L. 81-681, also referred to in this Code section, is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 777

et seq.

27-1-11.
Consent to acquisition of land by United States government for conservation purposes; notice of intended use.

The consent of the State of Georgia is given to the acquisition by the United States government by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise of such areas of land or water or of land and water in the State of Georgia as the United States government may deem necessary for the conservation, protection, propagation, and development of all species of fish and wildlife and for other conservation purposes. However, the State of Georgia reserves full and complete jurisdiction and authority over all such areas not incompatible with the administration, maintenance, protection, and control thereof by the United States government under the first terms of any act of Congress authorizing such acquisitions.

The consent given by subsection (a) of this Code section is conditioned on the requirement that, prior to the acquisition, notice shall be given by the federal government to the department of plans stating the specific use to be made of and the specific location and description of the lands desired by the federal government for any such conservation use and, further, that the plan for acquisition of the lands shall be approved by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 123, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-113, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-12.
Federal-state cooperation in protection and management of wildlife in national forest; powers of board.

The department shall have the authority to enter into cooperative agreements with the United States government or with the proper authorities thereof for the protection and management of the wildlife resources of the national forest lands within the State of Georgia and for the restocking of the same with desirable species of wildlife.

After entering into an agreement under subsection (a) of this Code section, the board shall have the authority to close all hunting and fishing in the national forest lands within this state for such period of time as the board may deem necessary. The board shall have authority from time to time to prescribe the season for hunting or fishing in such lands, to prescribe the number of animals, fish, and birds that may be taken from such lands and the size thereof, and to prescribe the conditions under which the same may be taken.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 375, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 27; Code 1933, § 45-109, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-13.
Disposition of funds received by department; appropriations; grants and donations for natural resources conservation camps.

All funds resulting from the operation of the department and from the administration of the laws and regulations pertaining to wildlife, excluding fines, but including all license fees and other income (except that income provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section), shall be paid into the general funds of the state treasury; and each year at least such amount shall be appropriated to the department. The board shall be authorized to establish, by rule or regulation, a procedure to refund fees collected in error or overpayment or to which the department or state is otherwise not entitled.

The department is authorized to accept grants and donations (either monetary or of real or personal property) for the purpose of creating and maintaining natural resources conservation camps in the state. Any donation or grant so received and any income therefrom or any income derived from the operation of any of the camps shall be held and maintained by the department for the exclusive use and the benefit of each of said camps. The board is authorized and directed to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations respecting the operation of said camps.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department is authorized to retain all miscellaneous funds generated by the operation of its wildlife management areas and refuges, its public fishing areas, and its wildlife, hunter, and boating education programs for use in the operation and maintenance of those areas, refuges, and programs. Any such funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited in the state treasury. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow the department to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury. The department shall comply with all provisions of Code Section 45-5-7, Parts 1 and 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act,” except Code Section 45-12-92, prior to expending any such miscellaneous funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, § 8; Code 1933, § 45-220; Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 8; Code 1933, § 45-114, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 323, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 27; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 27; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 558, § 4/SB 121.

Cross references.

Payment of revenue into general fund of state treasury, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. III, Para. II.

27-1-14.
Disposition of fines and bond forfeitures.

The proceeds from all fines and bond forfeitures arising from criminal prosecution for violation of the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations shall, except as otherwise specifically provided in this title, be applied initially to payment of the fees of the officers of the trial court and court costs as prescribed by law. Any money remaining after such disposition shall be remitted promptly by the clerk of the court in which the case is disposed of to the county treasurer of the county in which the fine is assessed, who shall deposit the funds in the general funds of the county.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, § 4; Code 1933, § 45-127; Ga. L. 1935, p. 386, § 11; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 17; Code 1933, § 45-115, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 20; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

27-1-15.
[Reserved] Wildlife technicians.

History.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 27/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013; repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 3, effective July 1, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 3 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1981.

27-1-16.
Establishment of unit of game wardens; qualifications, appointment, and supervisory personnel; retention of badge and weapon upon disability retirement.

Within the department is established a unit of peace officers to be known as game wardens. All such game wardens shall be at least 21 years of age. Such unit of peace officers shall include, but not be limited to, the commissioner and other supervisory personnel; provided, however, that the commissioner and the director of the division to which peace officer functions are assigned shall be excluded from the classified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 unless otherwise provided by law. The commissioner shall have the power to appoint such a number of game wardens of the state at large, as may be necessary to carry out the duties assigned to them, who shall be charged with the law enforcement responsibilities pertaining to the department.

After a game warden has accumulated 25 years of service with the department as a peace officer and upon leaving such department under honorable conditions, such game warden shall be entitled as part of such officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

As used in this subsection, the term “disability” means a disability that prevents an individual from working as a law enforcement officer. When a game warden leaves the department as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, such game warden shall be entitled as part of such officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, §§ 1-3; Code 1933, § 45-124; Ga. L. 1943, p. 128, § 19; Ga. L. 1945, p. 404, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1483, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1453, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-116, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 8; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 392, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1058, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 27/HB 95; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-32/HB 642; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in three places in subsection (a), and substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in two places in subsection (b) and in two places in subsection (c).

Cross references.

Employment and training of peace officers, §

35-8-1

et seq.

Authority of conservation rangers to enforce boat safety laws, § 52-7-25.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

27-1-17.
Deputy game wardens.

The board shall have the power to appoint deputy game wardens. No deputy game wardens may be appointed without actual duties relating to the protection of natural resources.

Deputy game wardens shall have all or part of the powers and duties of game wardens, as assigned by the board. Deputy game wardens who are not employees of the department shall receive no compensation for their services. The board is authorized to appoint such number of deputy game wardens as may be necessary to carry out the duties assigned to them.

Each deputy game warden who is not an employee of the department shall personally secure a bond of not less than $5,000.00 from a bonding or surety company licensed to transact business in the State of Georgia conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties, payable to the department.

The board shall have the power to adopt rules and regulations concerning qualifications, appointments, badge, oath of office, and other matters pertaining to deputy game wardens.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 151, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1483, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-117, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” twice in subsection (a), in four places in subsection (b), and once in subsection (d); and substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in subsection (c).

Cross references.

Authority of conservation rangers to enforce boat safety laws, § 52-7-25.

27-1-18.
Powers of game wardens generally.

Game wardens shall have the power and authority:

To enforce all state laws on all property owned or controlled by the department;

To enforce all state laws pertaining to functions assigned to the department;

To enforce any state law when the violation of that law is committed in conjunction with a violation of a state law pertaining to functions assigned to the department;

To enforce any state law when ordered to do so by the Governor or to protect any life or property when the circumstances demand action; and

At the expense of the department, to assist the Department of Public Safety and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation in carrying out their duties and responsibilities when requested to do so by the Department of Public Safety or the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

The commissioner may, and in the case of a request by the Governor shall, authorize and direct the department’s game wardens to cooperate with and render assistance to any law enforcement agency of this state or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof in any criminal case, in the prevention or detection of violations of any law, or in the apprehension or arrest of persons who violate the criminal laws of this state, any other state, or the United States, upon a request by the governing authority or chief law enforcement officer of any municipality, the sheriff of any county, a judge of the superior court of any county, or the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1483, § 3; Code 1933, § 45-118, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 11; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1990, p. 376, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Game wardens” for “Conservation rangers” in the introductory language of subsection (a) and substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Authority of conservation rangers to inspect coastal marshland to ascertain whether laws pertaining to protection of such areas are being observed, §

12-5-286

.

27-1-19.
Power of game wardens and deputy game wardens to arrest persons; procedure upon failure of person arrested to appear to answer charges.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, game wardens and deputy game wardens, when authorized to do so by the board, may arrest persons accused of violating any law or regulation which such officers are empowered to enforce by the issuance of a citation, provided that the offense is committed in the presence of the officer or information concerning the offense constituting a basis for arrest was received by the arresting officer from a law enforcement officer observing the offense being committed. The arresting officer may issue to the person a citation which shall enumerate the specific charges against the person and the date upon which the person is to appear and answer the charges. Whenever an arrest is made by the arresting officer on the basis of information received from another law enforcement officer observing the offense being committed, the citation shall list the name of each officer, and each must be present when the charges against the offender are heard.

If the person charged shall fail to appear as specified in the citation, the judge having jurisdiction of the offense may issue a warrant ordering the apprehension of the person and commanding that he be brought before the court to answer the charge contained within the citation and the charge of his failure to appear as required. The person shall then be allowed to make a reasonable bond to appear on a given date before the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 522, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-119, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” twice in subsection (a).

Cross references.

Acceptance of cash bonds for violation of game and fish laws, §

17-6-5

et seq.

27-1-20.
Additional powers of game wardens; functions of other agencies assigned to department.

In addition to the powers enumerated in Code Sections 27-1-18 and 27-1-19, game wardens shall have all the powers previously vested in any other law enforcement officers within the department including, but not limited to, the following:

To enforce all laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to wildlife and to boating safety and as otherwise provided;

To execute all warrants and search warrants for the violation of the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to wildlife or to boating safety;

To serve subpoenas issued for the examination, investigation, and trial of all offenses against the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to wildlife or to boating safety;

To arrest without warrant any person found violating any of the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to wildlife or to hunting, fishing, or boating;

To seize and take possession of all wildlife or parts thereof taken, caught, killed, captured, possessed, or controlled or which have been shipped or are about to be shipped at any time and in any manner or for any purpose contrary to the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to wildlife;

To go upon property outside of buildings, posted or otherwise, in the performance of their duties;

To carry firearms while performing duties pertaining to wildlife;

To seize as evidence, without warrant, any device other than a boat, vehicle, or aircraft when they have cause to believe that its possession or use is in violation of any of the provisions of the laws or regulations dealing with wildlife. For the purposes of this Code section, “device” includes any light, hunting apparatus, or fishing or netting gear or tackle;

To enter and inspect any commercial cold storage warehouse, ice house, locker plant, butcher shop, or other plant or building for the purpose of determining whether wildlife is being kept or stored therein in violation of the wildlife laws or regulations; and

To exercise the full authority of peace officers while in the performance of their duties.

Unless inconsistent with this title, whenever any statute pertaining to an agency whose functions are assigned to the department refers to law enforcement personnel of that agency, that reference applies to game wardens.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 4; Ga. L. 1912, p. 113, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, §§ 1-3; Code 1933, §§ 45-108, 45-126; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 18; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 6; Ga. L. 1970, p. 466, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1483, § 4; Code 1933, § 45-120, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in the introductory language of subsection (a) and at the end of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Searches without warrants generally, §

17-5-1

et seq.

Peace officers generally, §

35-8-1

et seq.

Enforcement of laws pertaining to boating safety, § 52-7-25.

27-1-21.
Seizure and disposal of wildlife illegally taken or possessed; civil action by possessor; disposal of wildlife unable to be stored; disposition of unmarketable items.

Game wardens, sheriffs, and other peace officers of this state or any political subdivision thereof shall seize any wildlife taken or possessed in violation of the wildlife laws and regulations of this state. Such wildlife shall be sold or disposed of in such manner as the commissioner may direct, in conformance with any rules and regulations promulgated by the board, at any time after the expiration of 30 days following the seizure, unless the owner thereof or the person in possession at the time of the seizure files a civil action against the State of Georgia, Department of Natural Resources, within 30 days following the seizure, in the state or superior court having jurisdiction in the county where the seizure was made. The person filing the action shall have the burden of proof, and the action shall be tried as other civil cases in such court. Items for which such an action has been filed shall be held pending the resolution of the action, provided that reasonable charges for storage shall be paid by the person filing the action in the event that such person does not prevail in the action.

If the wildlife seized is perishable or if by its nature, size, or quantity it cannot be humanely, conveniently, or economically stored, held, or contained, or if the wildlife seized poses a threat to public safety or public health, the commissioner may at any time order that it be disposed of and the proceeds, if any, held in escrow for 30 days following such seizure. If the owner thereof or the person in possession at the time of seizure files an action pursuant to this Code section, the action will be for the return of the proceeds, if any, and the proceeds will be held in escrow until final disposition of the action. If no such action is filed, the proceeds shall be paid into the state treasury.

Items for which there is no conveniently ascertainable commercial market may be donated to a charitable institution or otherwise disposed of as the commissioner may direct.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 466, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1288, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2863, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Game wardens” for “Conservation rangers” at the beginning of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

27-1-22.
Taking, possessing, and releasing of wildlife generally.

For purposes of wildlife management and in accordance with sound principles of wildlife research and management, authorized personnel of the department and persons authorized by contract with the department are authorized to take, transport, possess, purchase, sell, band, and release wildlife at such times, by such methods, and in such quantities as are otherwise made unlawful by this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-214, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 16.

27-1-23.
Inspection of business premises and records of commercial license holders.

Any commercial license holder shall be deemed, by application for such license, to have agreed to make his business premises and records available for inspection by authorized agents of the department during normal business hours and at any other time when the licensed commercial activity is being conducted on such premises.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-211, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-24.
Inspection of vessels and boats.

The provisions of this title or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this title pertaining to the operation of vessels or boats upon the waters of this state shall be enforceable by, in addition to game wardens, agents of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and other persons having responsibility to preserve the peace and enforce the laws of this state. Such persons shall have the authority to order any vessel or boat within the boundaries of this state to stop and lay to and shall have the authority to board, inspect, and examine the vessel or boat, its equipment, the wildlife on board, if any, and such documents, licenses, or other records which the vessel or boat is required to possess under this title and Code Sections 52-7-1 through 52-7-25 for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of such laws.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-123, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1283, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in the first sentence of this Code section.

Cross references.

Enforcement of laws relating to boating safety generally, § 52-7-25.